Nevada, session 83, AB154.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 18 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 17, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 3 to 6, inclusive,
of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Local government” means any political subdivision
of this State that receives any public funding, including, without
limitation, any county, city, town, board, airport authority,
regional transportation commission, fire protection district,
irrigation district, school district or other special district that
performs a governmental function and receives any public
funding.
Sec. 4. “Office” means the Nevada Office of the Inspector
General created by section 7 of this act.
Sec. 5. “State agency” means an agency, bureau, board,
commission, department, division, officer or employee of the
Executive Department of State Government.
Sec. 6. “Waste” means the squandering of money or
resources, whether or not the activity is unlawful.
Sec. 7. 1. The Nevada Office of the Inspector General is
hereby created. The Nevada Office of the Inspector General
consists of the Inspector General and any person employed by the
Office.
2. The Governor shall appoint the Inspector General for a
term of 4 years, and until a successor is appointed and qualified,
from a list of three candidates submitted by the Legislative
Commission. The Inspector General may be reappointed, and the
Legislative Commission shall include the incumbent Inspector
General on its list of candidates unless the Commission
determines that the incumbent should not be recommended for
reappointment for cause, including, without limitation,
inefficiency, neglect of duty or malfeasance in office. A vacancy in
the position of Inspector General must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment.
3. The Inspector General may be removed from office only by
impeachment for misdemeanor or malfeasance in office. The
Inspector General shall be deemed to be a state officer for the
purposes of NRS 283.140 to 283.290, inclusive.
4. The Inspector General must have the demonstrated ability
to administer a major public agency in the field of auditing,
-
*AB154*

– 4 –
investigations, inspections or performance reviews of programs of
governmental agencies, including, without limitation:
(a) Experience in accounting, auditing, financial analysis,
law, management analysis, public administration, investigation,
criminal justice administration or any other closely related field;
(b) Certification as a Certified Fraud Examiner by the
Association of Certified Fraud Examiners, or its successor
organization, and as a Certified Inspector General by the
Association of Inspectors General, or its successor organization,
not later than 18 months after appointment as the Inspector
General; and
(c) Continued status as a Certified Inspector General by the
Association of Inspectors General, or its successor organization,
while in office.
5. The Inspector General:
(a) Is in the unclassified service of the State.
(b) Shall devote his or her entire time and attention to the
business of his or her office and shall not engage in any other
gainful employment or occupation.
(c) Is ineligible for elective public office under the government
and laws of this State, other than federal office, for 4 years after
the date he or she leaves office.
Sec. 8. The Inspector General shall administer this chapter
and all other provisions of law relating to the functions of the
Office.
Sec. 9. 1. The Inspector General:
(a) Shall appoint a deputy inspector general and a special
counsel. The deputy inspector general and special counsel are in
the unclassified service of the State.
(b) May, within the limits of available money, employ such
other persons as he or she deems necessary to provide an
appropriate staff for the Office, including, without limitation,
auditors, administrative staff, investigators and sworn peace
officers. The Inspector General may employ category II peace
officers. Any such persons employed pursuant to this paragraph
are in the classified service of the State.
2. The Inspector General may enter into contracts for the
services of certified public accountants, qualified management
consultants or other professional experts necessary to
independently perform the functions of the Office, within the
limits of money available for that purpose.
Sec. 10. 1. The Inspector General shall:
(a) Establish and maintain a full-time program of auditing,
investigation, inspection and performance review of each state
agency and local government to provide increased accountability
-
*AB154*

– 5 –
and oversight of each state agency and local government and to
assist in improving operations and deterring and identifying fraud,
waste, abuse or corruption; and
(b) Upon request by the Governor, but not less often than
quarterly, submit a report to the Governor and to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature
setting forth any findings and conclusions relating to an audit,
investigation, inspection or review specified in subsection 2 and
any suggested corrective or remedial actions, including, without
limitation, increased oversight, carrying out or modifying any
controls for internal management, termination of employment or
referral to the Commission on Ethics or the Attorney General
when appropriate.
2. The Inspector General may:
(a) Engage in prevention activities, including, without
limitation, the review of legislation, rules, regulations, policies and
procedures of a state agency or local government and
transactions, training and education conducted by any state
agency or local government.
(b) Review the reliability and validity of the information
provided through the performance measures and standards of any
state agency or local government.
(c) Conduct a review of the performance measurement system
of any state agency or local government.
(d) Attend any meeting held by any state agency or local
government.
(e) Audit the economy, efficiency and effectiveness of the
operations and functions of any state agency or local government.
(f) Audit, inspect, investigate and review the activities, records,
procurements, grants, agreements and other financial
arrangements undertaken by any state agency, local government,
contractor, grantee or other recipient of money, property or
services to be spent or used on behalf of the State or a political
subdivision, but not including a natural person who is receiving:
(1) Compensation for employment; or
(2) An income subsidy with no restriction on his or her use
of the money or property.
(g) Recommend remedial actions to be taken by any state
agency or local government to overcome or correct operating or
maintenance deficiencies or inefficiencies identified by the Office.
(h) Establish a program for receiving, reviewing and
investigating any complaint submitted to the Inspector General
concerning any fraud, waste, abuse or corruption within any state
agency or local government, including, without limitation,
deficiencies in the operation and maintenance of facilities, and
-
*AB154*

– 6 –
referral of those complaints to the appropriate state agency or
local government.
(i) Conduct civil, criminal and administrative investigations.
(j) Conduct joint investigations and projects with other
oversight or law enforcement agencies.
(k) Provide information and evidence relating to alleged
criminal acts to the appropriate law enforcement officials.
(l) Refer matters for further civil, criminal and administrative
action to the appropriate administrative and prosecutorial
agencies.
(m) Identify any other state agency or local government that is
responsible for auditing, investigating, inspecting or reviewing the
operation and management of a state agency or local government,
including, without limitation, the Inspector General of the
Department of Corrections, and coordinate with those state
agencies and local governments to share information and avoid
any duplication of activities.
(n) Issue public reports.
(o) Adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this
chapter.
(p) Perform any other task relating to his or her duties as he or
she determines is necessary.
Sec. 11. 1. The Inspector General shall:
(a) Establish a telephone number at which a person may
confidentially report to the Office information relating to abuse,
fraud or waste with respect to public money received and used by a
state agency or contractor; and
(b) Create a written notice that:
(1) Clearly identifies the telephone number established
pursuant to paragraph (a); and
(2) Contains a statement directing any person with any
information relating to abuse, fraud or waste with respect to
public money received and used by a state agency or contractor to
report the information at the telephone number established
pursuant to paragraph (a).
2. The written notice created pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 must be posted conspicuously:
(a) In each public building of each state agency; and
(b) On the Internet website maintained by the Office.
3. Upon receipt of information from a person calling the
telephone number established pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1, the Office must perform a review and prepare a
report of its findings. The report is a public record and:
(a) Must include, without limitation, an explanation of:
(1) The purpose of the review; and
-
*AB154*

– 7 –
(2) Any resolution or corrective action taken by the Office
that resulted from the review.
(b) Must not include the identity of the person who reported
the information.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 5, any
information reported to the Office at the telephone number
established pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1, including,
without limitation, the identity of the person who reported the
information, is confidential.
5. The Office shall not disclose information that is
confidential pursuant to subsection 4 except:
(a) Pursuant to NRS 239.0115;
(b) For the purpose of carrying out any duty of the Office or
for the purpose of assisting the Director of the Office of Finance
or Administrator of the Division of Internal Audits of the Office of
Finance in carrying out any duty of the Director or Administrator;
(c) Upon the lawful order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
or
(d) To the Office of the Attorney General or the office of a
district attorney within this State for the purpose of investigating
the alleged abuse, fraud or waste reported to the Nevada Office of
the Inspector General.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Contractor” means any person, business, organization or
nonprofit corporation that contracts with a state agency or local
government to receive public money. The term includes, without
limitation, a subcontractor or a third party who receives any
portion of the public money from the contractor to carry out any
obligation pursuant to a contract between the contractor and the
state agency or local government.
(b) “Public money” means any money deposited with a
depository by the State Treasurer and includes, without limitation,
money which is received by a state agency or local government
from the Federal Government for distribution and use in this State
pursuant to federal law or federal regulation.
Sec. 12. 1. Upon request by the Inspector General, each
state agency and local government and any employee of a state
agency or local government shall cooperate with and provide
assistance to the Inspector General in carrying out the provisions
of this chapter and shall ensure that the premises, equipment,
employees, books, papers, contracts, correspondence and other
records of the state agency or local government are available for
use by the Inspector General in carrying out those provisions.
2. A person who willfully prevents, impairs or prohibits the
Inspector General from initiating, carrying out or completing any
-
*AB154*

– 8 –
audit, investigation, inspection or review is guilty of a category E
felony and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
Sec. 13. 1. In carrying out the provisions of this chapter,
the Inspector General may subpoena the attendance of witnesses
or the production of books, papers and documents,
notwithstanding any claim of privilege.
2. If any person refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the
Inspector General, the Inspector General may present a petition to
the district court of the county in which the person resides, setting
forth the facts, and thereupon the court, in a proper case, shall
issue its subpoena to the person requiring his or her attendance
before the court to testify or to produce books, papers and
documents.
3. Any person failing or refusing to obey the subpoena of a
district court may be proceeded against in the same manner as for
a refusal to obey any other order of the court.
Sec. 14. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the Inspector General shall make public an annual report of
audits, investigations, inspections and reviews conducted by the
Office after such audits, investigations, inspections or reviews are
concluded.
2. A report made public pursuant to subsection 1 must not
include:
(a) The personal identifying information of an original source
without his or her written consent; or
(b) Any information deemed privileged or confidential by law.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Original source” means a person who:
(1) Voluntarily discloses the information on which the
allegations or transactions for an audit, investigation, inspection
or review are based before the public disclosure of the
information; or
(2) Has knowledge of information that is independent of
and materially adds to any allegations or transactions which are
publicly disclosed and who voluntarily provides such information.
(b) “Personal identifying information” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 205.4617.
Sec. 15. 1. Audits, investigations, inspections and reviews
conducted by the Office must conform to professional standards,
including, without limitation, standards promulgated by the
Association of Inspectors General or its successor organization.
2. The Legislative Auditor shall, on or before July 1, 2028,
and at least once every 3 years thereafter, prepare and make
public a report reviewing a representative sample of the audits,
investigations, inspections and reviews conducted by the Office for
-
*AB154*

– 9 –
that time period for conformance with the professional standards
described in subsection 1.
Sec. 16. 1. The Nevada Office of the Inspector General’s
Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury as a special revenue
fund to be administered by the Office. All money received by the
Office must be deposited in the Fund. The money in the Fund
does not revert to the State General Fund at the end of any fiscal
year, and the balance in the Fund must be carried forward to the
next fiscal year.
2. The interest and income earned on the money in the Fund,
after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the
Fund. All claims against the Fund must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
3. The money in the Fund may be used only to pay the costs
of carrying out programs or laws administered by the Office.
Sec. 17. A person who willfully discharges, demotes,
suspends, threatens, harasses or discriminates against an
employee, contractor or agent as a result of a lawful complaint of
the employee, contractor or agent concerning any fraud, waste,
abuse or corruption within any state agency or local government is
guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 18. NRS 197.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
197.090 1. Except under circumstances where a greater
penalty is provided in subsection 2 or NRS 200.481, any person
who, by means of any threat, force or violence, attempts to deter or
prevent any executive or administrative officer from performing any
duty imposed upon the officer by law, or who knowingly resists by
force or violence any executive or administrative officer in the
performance of the officer’s duty, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
2. Any person who, by means of any threat, force or violence,
attempts to deter or prevent the Inspector General or an employee
of the Nevada Office of the Inspector General from performing
any duty imposed by law upon the Inspector General or the Office,
or who knowingly resists by force or violence the Inspector
General or an employee of the Office in the performance of his or
her duty, is guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as
provided in NRS 193.130.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Inspector General” means the Inspector General
appointed pursuant to section 7 of this act.
(b) “Nevada Office of the Inspector General” or “Office”
means the Nevada Office of the Inspector General created by
section 7 of this act.
-
*AB154*

– 10 –
Sec. 19. NRS 200.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.471 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means:
(1) Unlawfully attempting to use physical force against
another person; or
(2) Intentionally placing another person in reasonable
apprehension of immediate bodily harm.
(b) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(c) “Health care facility” means a facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS, an office of a person listed in NRS 629.031, a
clinic or any other location, other than a residence, where health
care is provided.
(d) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard or other correctional officer of a city or
county jail;
(5) The Inspector General appointed pursuant to section 7
of this act or any employee of the Nevada Office of the Inspector
General created by section 7 of this act;
(6) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
[(6)] (7) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court
of Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including a
person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed in this subparagraph;
[(7)] (8) An employee of this State or a political subdivision
of this State whose official duties require the employee to make
home visits;
[(8)] (9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law
enforcement agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
[(9)] (10) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-
fighting agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
-
*AB154*

– 11 –
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
[(10)] (11) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or
a political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
(e) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A physician, a medical student, a perfusionist, an
anesthesiologist assistant or a physician assistant licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 of NRS, a practitioner of respiratory care, a
homeopathic physician, an advanced practitioner of homeopathy, a
homeopathic assistant, an osteopathic physician, a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
633 of NRS, a podiatric physician, a podiatry hygienist, a physical
therapist, a medical laboratory technician, an optometrist, a
chiropractic physician, a chiropractic assistant, a naprapath, a doctor
of Oriental medicine, a nurse, a student nurse, a certified nursing
assistant, a nursing assistant trainee, a medication aide - certified, a
person who provides health care services in the home for
compensation, a dentist, a dental student, a dental hygienist, a dental
hygienist student, an expanded function dental assistant, an
expanded function dental assistant student, a pharmacist, a
pharmacy student, an intern pharmacist, an attendant on an
ambulance or air ambulance, a psychologist, a social worker, a
marriage and family therapist, a marriage and family therapist
intern, a clinical professional counselor, a clinical professional
counselor intern, a behavior analyst, an assistant behavior analyst, a
registered behavior technician, a mental health technician, a licensed
dietitian, the holder of a license or a limited license issued under the
provisions of chapter 653 of NRS, a public safety officer at a health
care facility, an emergency medical technician, an advanced
emergency medical technician, a paramedic or a participant in a
program of training to provide emergency medical services; or
(2) An employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
who:
(I) Interacts with the public;
(II) Performs tasks related to providing health care; and
-
*AB154*

– 12 –
(III) Wears identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the person as an employee or volunteer of the health care
facility.
(f) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
(g) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(h) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(i) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706.8816.
(j) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a taxicab.
(k) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus or
other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
(l) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility as
defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the employee
to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. A person convicted of an assault shall be punished:
(a) If paragraph (c) or (d) does not apply to the circumstances of
the crime and the assault is not made with the use of a deadly
weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a
misdemeanor.
(b) If the assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the
present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
(c) If paragraph (d) does not apply to the circumstances of the
crime and if the assault:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a provider of health care, a school employee,
-
*AB154*

– 13 –
a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a utility worker or a sports
official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, unless the assault is made with the use
of a deadly weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon,
then for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the assault:
(1) Is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who is in
lawful custody or confinement or a parolee upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The probationer, prisoner or parolee charged knew or
should have known that the victim was an officer, a provider of
health care, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a
utility worker or a sports official,
 for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130, unless the
assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the present
ability to use a deadly weapon, then for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 20. NRS 200.481 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.481 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Battery” means any willful and unlawful use of force or
violence upon the person of another.
(b) “Child” means a person less than 18 years of age.
(c) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(d) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard, matron or other correctional officer of a
city or county jail or detention facility;
-
*AB154*

– 14 –
(5) The Inspector General appointed pursuant to section 7
of this act or an employee of the Nevada Office of the Inspector
General created by section 7 of this act;
(6) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
[(6)] (7) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court
of Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including,
without limitation, a person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed
in this subparagraph;
[(7)] (8) An employee of this State or a political subdivision
of this State whose official duties require the employee to make
home visits;
[(8)] (9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law
enforcement agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
[(9)] (10) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-
fighting agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
[(10)] (11) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or
a political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.471.
(f) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
(g) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
-
*AB154*

– 15 –
(h) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(i) “Strangulation” means intentionally applying sufficient
pressure to another person to make it difficult or impossible for the
person to breathe, including, without limitation, applying pressure to
the neck, throat or windpipe that may prevent or hinder breathing or
reduce the intake of air, or applying any pressure to the neck on
either side of the windpipe, but not the windpipe itself, to stop the
flow of blood to the brain via the carotid arteries.
(j) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706.8816.
(k) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a taxicab.
(l) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus or
other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
(m) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility as
defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the employee
to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 200.485, a person
convicted of a battery, other than a battery committed by an adult
upon a child which constitutes child abuse, shall be punished:
(a) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and no
substantial bodily harm to the victim results, except under
circumstances where a greater penalty is provided in this section or
NRS 197.090, for a misdemeanor.
(b) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and
either substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the battery is
committed by strangulation, for a category C felony as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) If:
(1) The battery is committed upon:
(I) An officer, school employee, taxicab driver, transit
operator or utility worker who was performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event;
(2) The officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official
suffers substantial bodily harm or the battery is committed by
strangulation; and
-
*AB154*

– 16 –
(3) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official,
 for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, or by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by
both fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the battery:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, school employee, taxicab driver, transit
operator or utility worker who is performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, except under circumstances where a
greater penalty is provided in this section.
(e) If the battery is committed with the use of a deadly weapon,
and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $10,000.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years, and
may be further punished by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(f) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, without the use of
a deadly weapon, whether or not substantial bodily harm results and
whether or not the battery is committed by strangulation, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years.
(g) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, with the use of a
deadly weapon, and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
-
*AB154*

– 17 –
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years.
Sec. 21. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
[353A.049,] 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
-
*AB154*

– 18 –
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
-
*AB154*

– 19 –
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and sections 11 and 14 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41
of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter
391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law
to be confidential, all public books and public records of a
governmental entity must be open at all times during office hours to
inspection by any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or
memorandum may be prepared from those public books and public
records. Any such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to
supply the general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the
records or may be used in any other way to the advantage of the
governmental entity or of the general public. This section does not
supersede or in any manner affect the federal laws governing
copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in any other manner the
rights of a person in any written book or record which is
copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
-
*AB154*

– 20 –
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 22. NRS 289.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
289.470 “Category II peace officer” means:
1. The bailiffs of the district courts, justice courts and
municipal courts whose duties require them to carry weapons and
make arrests;
2. Subject to the provisions of NRS 258.070, constables and
their deputies;
3. Inspectors employed by the Nevada Transportation
Authority who exercise those powers of enforcement conferred by
chapters 706 and 712 of NRS;
4. Special investigators who are employed full-time by the
office of any district attorney or the Attorney General;
5. Investigators of arson for fire departments who are specially
designated by the appointing authority;
6. Investigators for the State Forester Firewarden who are
specially designated by the State Forester Firewarden and whose
primary duties are related to the investigation of arson;
7. Agents of the Nevada Gaming Control Board who exercise
the powers of enforcement specified in NRS 289.360, 463.140 or
463.1405, except those agents whose duties relate primarily to
auditing, accounting, the collection of taxes or license fees, or the
investigation of applicants for licenses;
8. Investigators and administrators of the Division of
Compliance Enforcement of the Department of Motor Vehicles who
perform the duties specified in subsection 2 of NRS 481.048;
9. Officers and investigators of the Section for the Control of
Emissions From Vehicles and the Enforcement of Matters Related
to the Use of Special Fuel of the Department of Motor Vehicles who
perform the duties specified in subsection 3 of NRS 481.0481;
10. Legislative police officers of the State of Nevada;
11. Parole counselors of the Division of Child and Family
Services of the Department of Health and Human Services;
-
*AB154*

– 21 –
12. Criminal investigators who are employed by the Division
of Child and Family Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services;
13. Juvenile probation officers and deputy juvenile probation
officers employed by the various judicial districts in the State of
Nevada or by a department of juvenile justice services established
by ordinance pursuant to NRS 62G.210 whose official duties require
them to enforce court orders on juvenile offenders and make arrests;
14. Field investigators of the Taxicab Authority;
15. Security officers employed full-time by a city or county
whose official duties require them to carry weapons and make
arrests;
16. The chief of a department of alternative sentencing created
pursuant to NRS 211A.080 and the assistant alternative sentencing
officers employed by that department;
17. Agents of the Cannabis Compliance Board who exercise
the powers of enforcement specified in NRS 289.355;
18. Criminal investigators who are employed by the Secretary
of State; [and]
19. The Inspector General of the Department of Corrections
and any person employed by the Department as a criminal
investigator [.] ; and
20. The Inspector General appointed pursuant to section 7 of
this act and any person employed as an investigator by the Nevada
Office of the Inspector General created by section 7 of this act.
Sec. 23. NRS 353A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353A.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Agency” means every agency, department, division, board,
commission or similar body, or elected officer, of the Executive
Branch of the State.
2. “Committee” means the Executive Branch Audit Committee
created pursuant to NRS 353A.038.
3. “Director” means the Director of the Office of Finance.
4. “Inspector General” means the Inspector General
appointed by the Governor pursuant to section 7 of this act.
5. “Internal accounting and administrative control” means a
method through which agencies can safeguard assets, check the
accuracy and reliability of their accounting information, promote
efficient operations and encourage adherence to prescribed
managerial policies.
Sec. 24. NRS 353A.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353A.025 1. The head of each agency shall periodically
review the agency’s system of internal accounting and
administrative control to determine whether it is in compliance with
-
*AB154*

– 22 –
the uniform system of internal accounting and administrative control
for agencies adopted pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 353A.020.
2. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, the head of
each agency shall report to the Director whether the agency’s
system of internal accounting and administrative control is in
compliance with the uniform system adopted pursuant to subsection
1 of NRS 353A.020. The reports must be made available for
inspection by the members of the Legislature.
3. For the purposes of this section, “agency” does not include:
(a) A board created by the provisions of NRS 590.485 and
chapters 623 to 625A, inclusive, 628, 630 to 644A, inclusive, 648,
654 and 656 of NRS.
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(c) The Public Employees’ Retirement System.
(d) The Housing Division of the Department of Business and
Industry.
(e) The Colorado River Commission of Nevada.
4. The Director shall, on or before the first Monday in
February of each odd-numbered year, submit a report on the status
of internal accounting and administrative controls in agencies to the:
(a) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
the:
(1) Senate Standing Committee on Finance; and
(2) Assembly Standing Committee on Ways and Means;
(b) Governor; [and]
(c) Inspector General; and
(d) Legislative Auditor.
5. The report submitted by the Director pursuant to subsection
4 must include, without limitation:
(a) The identification of each agency that has not complied with
the requirements of subsections 1 and 2;
(b) The identification of each agency that does not have an
effective method for reviewing its system of internal accounting and
administrative control; and
(c) The identification of each agency that has weaknesses in its
system of internal accounting and administrative control, and the
extent and types of such weaknesses.
Sec. 25. 1. On or before December 1, 2025, the Governor
shall appoint an Inspector General pursuant to section 7 of this act.
2. The Administrator of the Division of Internal Audits of the
Office of Finance is the acting Inspector General until the Governor
appoints the initial Inspector General pursuant to section 7 of this
act.
-
*AB154*

– 23 –
Sec. 26. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 27. NRS 353A.049 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 28. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 27, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
353A.049 Reports of abuse, fraud or waste regarding
public money received and used by agency or contractor:
Establishment of telephone number by Director; notice; action
by Division; confidentiality; disclosure.
1. The Director shall:
(a) Establish a telephone number at which a person may
confidentially report to the Division information relating to abuse,
fraud or waste with respect to public money received and used by an
agency or contractor; and
(b) Create a written notice that:
(1) Clearly identifies the telephone number established
pursuant to paragraph (a); and
(2) Contains a statement directing any person with any
information relating to abuse, fraud or waste with respect to public
money received and used by an agency or contractor to report the
information at the telephone number established pursuant to
paragraph (a).
2. The written notice created pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 must be posted conspicuously:
(a) In each public building of an agency; and
(b) On the Internet website maintained by the Office of Finance.
3. Upon receipt of information from a person calling the
telephone number established pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1, the Division shall perform a review and prepare a
report of its findings. The report is a public record and:
(a) Must include, without limitation, an explanation of:
(1) The purpose of the review; and
-
*AB154*

– 24 –
(2) Any resolution or corrective action taken by the Division
that resulted from the review.
(b) Must not include the identity of the person who reported the
information.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 5, any
information reported to the Division at the telephone number
established pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1, including,
without limitation, the identity of the person who reported the
information, is confidential.
5. The Division shall not disclose information that is
confidential pursuant to subsection 4 except:
(a) Pursuant to NRS 239.0115;
(b) For the purpose of carrying out any duty of the Division
prescribed by NRS 353A.031 to 353A.100, inclusive, or for the
purpose of assisting the Director or Administrator in carrying out
any duty of the Director or Administrator prescribed by this chapter;
(c) Upon the lawful order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
or
(d) To the Office of the Attorney General or the office of a
district attorney within this State for the purpose of investigating the
alleged abuse, fraud or waste reported to the Division.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Contractor” means any person, business, organization or
nonprofit corporation that contracts with an agency to receive public
money. The term includes a subcontractor or a third party who
receives any portion of the public money from the contractor to
carry out any obligation pursuant to a contract between the
contractor and the agency.
(b) “Public money” means any money deposited with a
depository by the State Treasurer and includes money which is
received by an agency from the Federal Government for distribution
and use in this State pursuant to a federal law or federal regulation.
H
-
*AB154*